Utah statutes.
63M-2-201.   Science technology research buildings.

(1)  As funding becomes available from the Legislature or other sources, the Utah Science Technology and Research Governing Authority created in Part 3 shall:

(a)  construct at Utah State University:

(i)  a Bio Innovations Research Institute;

(ii)  an Infectious Disease Research Center; and

(iii)  an Informatics/Computing Research Center; and

(b)  construct at the University of Utah:

(i)  a Neuroscience and Biomedical Technology Research Building; and

(ii)  an Information Technology and Bioinformatics Research Center.

(2)  The governing authority shall, subject to any restrictions or directions established by the Legislature, plan, design, and construct the buildings.

(3) (a)  Utah State University shall provide the land for the construction of science technology and research buildings on its campus.

(b)  The University of Utah shall provide the land for the construction of science technology and research buildings on its campus.

(4)  The governing authority shall hold title to the research buildings.

(5)  The governing authority may:

(a)  lease the buildings to Utah State University and the University of Utah;

(b)  require research teams to generate a certain amount of revenue from grants or other sources to contribute to the project; and

(c)  unless prohibited by law, deposit lease payments and other money received from the universities and research teams with the state treasurer for deposit into the sinking funds created under Section 63B-1a-301 for debt service on the bonds issued to fund planning, design, and construction of the research buildings.

